Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2243.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3065(a) and (c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3065. Safe harbor for sexually exploited children.(a) Safe harbor.--(1) If it is determined by a law enforcement officer, after reasonable detention for investigative purposes, that an individual is under 18 years of age [and is determined to be a sexually exploited child as defined in section 3001 (relating to definitions)], the individual shall be immune from:[(1)] (i) Prosecution or adjudication as a 12345678910111213141516171819 delinquent child for a violation of [sections 5507 (relating to obstructing highways and other public passages) and] section 5902(a) (relating to prostitution and related offenses).[(2)] (ii) Revocation of an existing term of probation or parole arising from a conviction or adjudication for another offense if the revocation is based on conduct under [paragraph (1).] subparagraph (i).(2) If it is determined by a law enforcement officer, after reasonable detention for investigative purposes, A PROSECUTING ATTORNEY OR A COURT DETERMINES that an individual is under 18 years of age and is determined to be a sexually exploited child as defined in section 3001 (relating to definitions), the individual shall be immune from:(i) Prosecution or adjudication as a delinquent child for a noncriminal delinquent act, summary offense, misdemeanor or felony that is not a crime of violence committed as a result of the individual's trafficking victimization. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term "crime of violence" shall mean the same as defined under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses).(I) PROSECUTION OR ADJUDICATION AS A DELINQUENT CHILD FOR ANY ACT OR OFFENSE DIRECTLY RELATED TO OR COMMITTED AS A DIRECT RESULT OF THE CHILD'S VICTIMIZATION, EXCEPT FOR:(A) AN OFFENSE UNDER:(I) SECTION 2502(A) OR (B) (RELATING TO MURDER).(II) CHAPTER 30 (RELATING TO HUMAN 20260HB2243PN3606 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TRAFFICKING), IF THE OFFENSE INVOLVED SEXUAL SERVITUDE.(III) CHAPTER 31 (RELATING TO SEXUAL OFFENSES).(IV) SECTION 4302 (RELATING TO INCEST).(V) SECTION 5902(B.1) (RELATING TO PROSTITUTION AND RELATED OFFENSES).(VI) SECTION 6320 (RELATING TO SEXUAL EXPLOITATION OF CHILDREN).(B) A "CRIME OF VIOLENCE" AS DEFINED UNDER 42 PA.C.S. § 9714(G) (RELATING TO SENTENCES FOR SECOND AND SUBSEQUENT OFFENSES).(ii) Revocation of an existing term of probation or parole arising from a conviction or adjudication for another offense if the revocation is based on conduct under subparagraph (i).* * *(c) Detainment.--An individual determined BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER to be [a sexually exploited child as defined in section 3001 [(relating to definitions)] ELIGIBLE FOR IMMUNITY UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) shall be detained no longer than necessary and only to assist the child in securing specialized services available under section 3062 (relating to specialized services for sexually exploited children) [or to refer the child to a county agency if required under 42 Pa.C.S. § 6328 (relating to dependency in lieu of delinquency)] AND TO REFER THE INDIVIDUAL TO A COUNTY AGENCY UNDER SUBSECTION (C.1).(C.1) MANDATORY REFERRAL FOR EVALUATION AND DATA COLLECTION.--AN INDIVIDUAL DETERMINED TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR IMMUNITY UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) SHALL BE REFERRED TO A COUNTY 20260HB2243PN3606 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AGENCY FOR THE PURPOSES OF:(1) EVALUATING THE INDIVIDUAL'S NEED FOR SPECIALIZED SERVICES UNDER SECTION 3062 (RELATING TO SPECIALIZED SERVICES FOR SEXUALLY EXPLOITED CHILDREN).(2) ASSISTING THE INDIVIDUAL IN SECURING ANY NECESSARY SPECIALIZED SERVICES AVAILABLE UNDER SECTION 3062.(3) COMPILING ANONYMOUS DATA REGARDING THE INCIDENCE OF CHILD EXPLOITATION TO ENSURE THE ACCURATE ALLOCATION OF FEDERAL AND STATE FUNDING FOR PROTECTIVE PROGRAMS.(4) DETERMINING IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS A DEPENDENT CHILD AS DEFINED UNDER 42 PA.C.S. § 6302 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS) TO ENSURE THE CHILD'S SAFETY FROM FURTHER EXPLOITATION.* * *Section 2. Section 6328 of Title 42 is repealed:[§ 6328. Dependency in lieu of delinquency.(a) Referral to county agency.--The offenses provided under subsection (b) shall be referred to a county agency under 23 Pa.C.S. §§ 6362 (relating to responsibilities of county agency for child protective services) and 6375 (relating to county agency requirements for general protective services) if the offense:(1) Is committed by a child as a direct result of being a sexually exploited child as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001 (relating to definitions).(2) Is directly related to having been subject to human trafficking as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001.(b) Eligible offenses.--Eligible offenses for referral to a county agency include the following:(1) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3503 (relating to criminal trespass).(2) 18 Pa.C.S. § 4914 (relating to false identification 20260HB2243PN3606 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to law enforcement authorities).(3) 18 Pa.C.S. § 5503 (relating to disorderly conduct).(4) 18 Pa.C.S. § 5506 (relating to loitering and prowling at night time).(5) An offense for simple possession of a controlled substance under section 13(a)(16) and (31) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.(c) Delinquency proceedings.--(1) If an offense listed in subsection (b) is referred to a county agency, delinquency proceedings under this chapter may not be commenced immediately.(2) If treatment and social services are unsuccessful while the dependency petition is pending, as evidenced by the child's behavior, and the county agency believes that juvenile justice services are necessary and warranted, the county agency shall refer the child's case to the juvenile probation department or district attorney's office for the commencement of delinquency proceedings.(d) Record expungement.--Upon the final discharge of supervision, juvenile court records relating to an offense listed in subsection (b) shall be expunged by the court under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9123 (relating to juvenile records).]Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2243PN3606 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324